District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.20a

Authority to promulgate regulations.

(a)

The Mayor shall promulgate rules to implement this chapter. The proposed rules shall be transmitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the rules within the 45-day review period, the rules shall be deemed disapproved.

(b)

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of D.C. Law 16-31, within 180 days of October, 20, 2005.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1388, c. 854, § 1258a
as added Mar. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-84, § 2(e), 49 DCR 198
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-31, § 2(j), 52 DCR 7195
D.C. Law 16-31 rewrote section, which had read as follows: “The Mayor shall promulgate rules to implement §§ 40-301.01 through 40-303.20 in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.”